Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Licensing.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

Collateral references. —

61 Am. Jur. 2d, Physicians, Surgeons and Other Healers, §§ 30-105.

70 C.J.S., Physicians and Surgeons, § 11 et seq.

Pardon as restoring public office or license or eligibility therefor, 58 ALR3d 1191.

Statute of limitations relating to medical malpractice actions as applicable to actions against unlicensed practitioner, 70 ALR3d 114.

Applicability of statute of limitations or doctrine of laches to proceeding to revoke or suspend license to practice medicine,
51 ALR4th 1147.

Filing of false insurance claims for medical services as ground for disciplinary action against dentist, physician, or other medical practitioner,
70 ALR4th 132.

Sec. 08.64.170.
License to practice medicine, podiatry, or osteopathy.

A person may not practice medicine, podiatry, or osteopathy in the state unless the person is licensed under this chapter, except that

a physician assistant may examine, diagnose, or treat persons under the supervision, control, and responsibility of either a physician licensed under this chapter or a physician exempted from licensing under AS

08.64.370

;

a person who is licensed or authorized under another law of the state may engage in a practice that is authorized under that law; and

a person may perform routine medical duties delegated under AS

08.64.106

.

[Repealed, § 4 ch 101 SLA 1974.]

A chiropodist practicing in the state on May 16, 1972, is exempt from this section.

A podiatrist practicing in the state on March 26, 1976, is exempt from this section, and shall be issued a license without examination if application is made within one year of March 26, 1976.

History.

(§ 35-3-81 ACLA 1949; am § 4 ch 148 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 21 SLA 1974; am §§ 3, 4 ch 101 SLA 1974; am §§ 1, 2 ch 24 SLA 1976; am § 8 ch 48 SLA 1983; am § 7 ch 6 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 36 SLA 1993; am § 5 ch 45 SLA 2018; am § 4 ch 29 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

For a temporary exception to the requirements of this section for certain persons providing treatment through telehealth during the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared on March 11, 2020, see § 7, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

For a temporary exception to the requirements of this section for certain practitioners providing treatment through telehealth during the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared on January 15, 2021, see sec. 8, ch. 2, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), added (a)(4), and made related changes.

The 2021 amendment, effective January 1, 2022, in (a), deleted former (a)(2), which read, “a mobile intensive care paramedic may render emergency lifesaving service;”, renumbered the remaining paragraphs accordingly, and in present (a)(2) substituted “law of the state” for “chapter of this title” following “authorized under another” and “law” for “chapter” following “authorized under that”.

Sec. 08.64.180.
Application for license.

A person who desires to practice medicine or osteopathy in the state shall apply in writing to the department for a license.

History.

(§ 35-3-85 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 143 SLA 1968; am § 3 ch 77 SLA 1969; am § 2 ch 21 SLA 1974; am § 8 ch 6 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

Sec. 08.64.190.
Contents of application.

The application must state the name, age, residence, the time spent in medical or osteopathy study, the place, year, and school in which degrees were granted, the applicant’s medical work history, and other information the board considers necessary. The application shall be made under oath. The board may verify information in the application through direct contact with the appropriate schools, medical boards, or other agencies that can substantiate the information.

History.

(§ 35-3-85 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 77 SLA 1969; am § 5 ch 126 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 45 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in the first sentence, deleted “the duration of residence,” following “residence,”.

Sec. 08.64.200.
Qualifications of physician applicants.

Except for foreign medical graduates as specified in AS

08.64.225

, each physician applicant shall

submit a certificate of graduation from a legally chartered medical school accredited by the Association of American Medical Colleges and the Council on Medical Education of the American Medical Association;

submit a certificate from a recognized hospital or hospitals certifying that the applicant has satisfactorily performed the duties of resident physician or intern for a period of

one year if the applicant graduated from medical school before January 1, 1995, as evidenced by a certificate of completion of the first year of postgraduate training from the facility where the applicant completed the first year of internship or residency; and

two years if the applicant graduated from medical school on or after January 1, 1995, as evidenced by a certificate of completion of the first year of postgraduate training from the facility where the applicant completed the first year of internship or residency and a certificate of successful completion of one additional year of postgraduate training at a recognized hospital;

submit a list of negotiated settlements or judgments in claims or civil actions alleging medical malpractice against the applicant, including an explanation of the basis for each claim or action;

not have a license to practice medicine in another state, country, province, or territory that is currently suspended or revoked for disciplinary reasons; and

receive education in pain management and opioid use and addiction, unless the applicant has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant does not currently hold a valid federal Drug Enforcement Administration registration number; an applicant may include past professional experience or professional education as proof of professional competence.

The board shall determine whether each physician applicant has any disciplinary or other actions recorded in the nationwide disciplinary data bank of the Federation of State Medical Boards. If the physician applicant was licensed or practiced in a jurisdiction that does not record information with the data bank of the Federation of State Medical Boards, the board shall contact the medical regulatory body of that jurisdiction to obtain comparable information about the applicant.

History.

(§ 35-3-85 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 18 SLA 1963; am § 5 ch 77 SLA 1969; am §§ 5, 6 ch 148 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 101 SLA 1974; am § 19 ch 48 SLA 1983; am § 5 ch 87 SLA 1987; am § 6 ch 126 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 53 SLA 1999; am § 2 ch 66 SLA 1999; am § 2 ch 52 SLA 2005; am § 8 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, added (a)(5), and made a related change.

Sec. 08.64.205.
Qualifications for osteopath applicants.

Each osteopath applicant shall meet the qualifications prescribed in AS

08.64.200(a)(3)

— (5) and shall

submit a certificate of graduation from the legally chartered school of osteopathy approved by the board;

submit a certificate from a hospital approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association that certifies that the osteopath has satisfactorily completed and performed the duties of intern or resident physician for

one year if the applicant graduated from a school of osteopathy before January 1, 1995, as evidenced by a certificate of completion of the first year of postgraduate training from the facility where the applicant completed the first year of internship or residency; or

two years if the applicant graduated from a school of osteopathy on or after January 1, 1995, as evidenced by a certificate of completion of the first year of postgraduate training from the facility where the applicant completed the first year of internship or residency and a certificate of successful completion of one additional year of postgraduate training at a recognized hospital;

take the examination required by AS

08.64.210

or be certified to practice by the National Board of Examiners for Osteopathic Physicians and Surgeons or by the National Board of Osteopathic Medical Examiners;

receive education in pain management and opioid use and addiction, unless the applicant has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant does not currently hold a valid federal Drug Enforcement Administration registration number; an applicant may include past professional experience or professional education as proof of professional competence.

History.

(§ 1 ch 56 SLA 1966; am § 6 ch 77 SLA 1969; am § 7 ch 148 SLA 1970; am § 6 ch 101 SLA 1974; am § 10 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 7 ch 126 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 53 SLA 1999; am § 3 ch 66 SLA 1999; am § 9 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in the introductory language substituted “AS

08.64.200(a)(3)

- (5)” for “AS

08.64.200(a)(3)

and (4)”; at the end of (3), added “or by the National Board of Osteopathic Medical Examiners;”; added (4).

Editor's notes. --

In 1987, “National Osteopathic Board of Examiners for Osteopathic Physicians and Surgeons” changed its name to “National Board of Osteopathic Medical Examiners”.

Sec. 08.64.207.
Qualifications for acupuncture applicants. [Repealed, § 15 ch
6 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 08.64.209.
Qualifications for podiatry applicants.

Each applicant who desires to practice podiatry shall meet the qualifications prescribed in AS

08.64.200(a)(3)

— (5) and shall

submit a certificate of graduation from a legally chartered school of podiatry approved by the board;

take the examination required by AS

08.64.210

; the board shall call to its aid a podiatrist of known ability who is licensed to practice podiatry to assist in the examination and licensure of applicants for a license to practice podiatry;

receive education in pain management and opioid use and addiction, unless the applicant has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant does not currently hold a valid federal Drug Enforcement Administration registration number; an applicant may include past professional experience or professional education as proof of professional competence;

meet other qualifications of experience or education that the board may require.

The provisions of AS

08.64.180

—

08.64.190

,

08.64.220

, and

08.64.230

—

08.64.380

relating to the practice of medicine or osteopathy apply to the application procedure, testing, and practice of podiatry, as appropriate.

History.

(§ 3 ch 24 SLA 1976; am § 11 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 8 ch 126 SLA 1990; am § 10 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in (a), in the introductory language, substituted “AS

08.64.200(a)(3)

- (5)” for “AS

08.64.200(a)(3)

and (4)”; added (a)(3), and made related and stylistic changes.

Sec. 08.64.210.
Examination required.

An applicant shall take examinations in subjects the board considers necessary, unless excused under provisions of AS

08.64.250

.

The deadline for submitting an exam application to the board shall be established by regulation.

History.

(§ 35-3-85 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1960; am § 7 ch 77 SLA 1969; am § 8 ch 148 SLA 1970; am § 6 ch 87 SLA 1987)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

Sec. 08.64.215.
Insurance required. [Repealed, § 40 ch 177 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 08.64.220.
Contents of examination and grading.

The board shall offer a written examination sufficient to test the applicant’s fitness to practice medicine or osteopathy.

[Repealed by § 27 ch 148 SLA 1970.]

The examinations, answers, and scores shall be preserved and filed.

History.

(§ 35-3-85 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1960; am §§ 8, 9 ch 77 SLA 1969; am §§ 9, 27 ch 148 SLA 1970; am § 7 ch 87 SLA 1987)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

Sec. 08.64.225.
Foreign medical graduates.

Applicants who are graduates of medical colleges not accredited by the Association of American Medical Colleges and the Council on Medical Education of the American Medical Association shall

meet the requirements of AS

08.64.200(a)(3)

— (5) and

08.64.255

;

have successfully completed

three years of postgraduate training as evidenced by a certificate of completion of the first year of postgraduate training from the facility where the applicant completed the first year of internship or residency and a certificate of successful completion of two additional years of postgraduate training at a recognized hospital; or

other requirements establishing proof of competency and professional qualifications as the board considers necessary to ensure the continued protection of the public adopted at the discretion of the board by regulation, including education in pain management and opioid use and addiction, unless the applicant has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant does not currently hold a valid federal Drug Enforcement Administration registration number; an applicant may include past professional experience or professional education as proof of professional competence; and

have passed examinations as specified by the board in regulations.

Requirements establishing proof of competency under (a)(2)(B) of this section may include

current licensure in another state and an active medical practice in that state for at least three years; or

current board certification in a practice specialty by the American Board of Medical Specialties.

In this section, “recognized hospital” means a hospital that has been approved for internship or residency training by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education or the Royal College of Physicians and Surgeons of Canada.

History.

(§ 10 ch 77 SLA 1969; am § 10 ch 148 SLA 1970; am § 7 ch 101 SLA 1974; am § 12 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 9 ch 126 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 53 SLA 1999; am § 4 ch 66 SLA 1999; am §§ 3, 4 ch 52 SLA 2005; am § 11 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(1), substituted “AS

08.64.200(a)(3)

— (5)” for “AS

08.64.200(a)(3)

and (4)”; in (a)(2)(B), added “, including education in pain management and opioid use and addiction, unless the applicant has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant does not currently hold a valid federal Drug Enforcement Administration registration number; an applicant may include past professional experience or professional education as proof of professional competence” following “board by regulation”.

Sec. 08.64.230.
License granted.

If a physician applicant passes the examination and meets the requirements of AS

08.64.200

and

08.64.255

, the board or its executive secretary shall grant a license to the applicant to practice medicine in the state.

If an osteopath applicant passes the examination and meets the requirements of AS

08.64.205

and

08.64.255

, the board or its executive secretary shall grant a license to the applicant to practice osteopathy in the state.

Each license shall be signed by the secretary and president of the board, and have the seal of the board affixed to it.

History.

(§ 35-3-85 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1960; am § 11 ch 77 SLA 1969; am §§ 10, 11 ch 126 SLA 1990; am §§ 7, 8 ch 45 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a) and (b), inserted “or its executive secretary” following “the board”.

Sec. 08.64.240.
License refused.

The board may not grant a license if

the applicant fails or cheats during the examination;

the applicant has surrendered a license in another jurisdiction while under investigation and the license has not been reinstated in that jurisdiction;

the board determines that the applicant is professionally unfit to practice medicine or osteopathy in the state; or

the applicant fails to comply with a requirement of this chapter.

The board may refuse to grant a license to any applicant for the same reasons that it may impose disciplinary sanctions under AS

08.64.326

.

History.

(§ 35-3-85 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1960; am § 12 ch 77 SLA 1969; am § 11 ch 148 SLA 1970; am § 9 ch 48 SLA 1983; am § 12 ch 126 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

For mobile intensive care paramedics, see 12 AAC 40, art. 4.

For physician assistants, see 12 AAC 40, art. 5.

Sec. 08.64.250.
License by credentials.

The board may waive the examination requirement and license by credentials if the physician, osteopath, or podiatry applicant meets the requirements of AS

08.64.200

,

08.64.205

, or

08.64.209

, submits proof of continued competence as required by regulation, pays the required fee, and has

an active license from a board of medical examiners established under the laws of a state or territory of the United States or a province or territory of Canada issued after thorough examination; or

passed an examination as specified by the board in regulations.

The board shall adopt regulations under (a) of this section that require an applicant to demonstrate professional competence in pain management and addiction disorders. An applicant may include past professional experience or professional education as proof of professional competence.

History.

(§ 35-3-85 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1960; am § 13 ch 77 SLA 1969; am § 8 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 12 ch 148 SLA 1970; am § 10 ch 48 SLA 1983; am § 13 ch 126 SLA 1990; am §§ 12, 13 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in the introductory language in (a), inserted “, osteopath,” following “Physician” and “,

08.64.205

,” following “requirements of AS

08.64.200

”; added (b).

Sec. 08.64.255.
Interviews.

An applicant for licensure may be interviewed in person by the board or by a member of the board before a license is issued. The interview must be recorded. If the application is denied on the basis of the interview, the denial shall be stated in writing, with the reasons for it, and the record shall be preserved.

History.

(§ 14 ch 77 SLA 1969; am § 13 ch 148 SLA 1970; am § 8 ch 87 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

Sec. 08.64.260.
Reexamination.

If the applicant fails the examination, the applicant may, on the same application and payment of a reexamination fee, take another examination not less than six months nor more than two years after the date of the first examination. If the applicant fails a second examination, the applicant may, after a year or more of further study or training approved by the board, make a new application for licensure.

[Repealed, § 21 ch 87 SLA 1987.]

[Repealed, § 21 ch 87 SLA 1987.]

[Repealed, § 21 ch 87 SLA 1987.]

History.

(§ 35-3-92 ACLA 1949; am § 15 ch 77 SLA 1969; am § 14 ch 148 SLA 1970; am §§ 36, 37 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 21 ch 87 SLA 1987)

Sec. 08.64.270.
Temporary permits.

The board, a member of the board, the executive secretary, or a person designated by the board to issue temporary permits may issue a temporary permit to a physician applicant, osteopath applicant, or podiatry applicant who meets the requirements of AS

08.64.200

,

08.64.205

,

08.64.209

, or

08.64.225

and pays the required fee.

A temporary permit issued under this section is valid for six months and shall be reviewed by the board at the next regularly scheduled board meeting that occurs after its issuance.

A temporary permit issued under this section may not be renewed.

The fee for a permit issued under this section is one-fourth of the fee for a biennial license, plus the appropriate application fee.

Upon application by the permittee and approval of the board, a permit issued under this section may be converted to a biennial license upon payment of the biennial fee minus the six-month permit fee paid under (d) of this section, plus the appropriate application fee.

History.

(§ 35-3-96 ACLA 1949; am § 16 ch 77 SLA 1969; am § 15 ch 148 SLA 1970; am §§ 2, 3 ch 85 SLA 1972; am § 8 ch 101 SLA 1974; am § 11 ch 48 SLA 1983; am § 9 ch 87 SLA 1987; am §§ 14, 15 ch 126 SLA 1990; am § 9 ch 45 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a) inserted “, a member of the board, the executive secretary, or a person designated by the board to issue temporary permits” following “The board”.

Sec. 08.64.272.
Residency and internship permits.

A person may not serve as a resident or intern without a permit issued under this section.

For the limited purpose of residency or internship, the board may issue a permit to an applicant without examination if the applicant meets the requirements of AS

08.64.200(a)(1)

and applicable regulations of the board, meets the requirements of AS

08.64.279

, pays the required fee, and has been accepted by an eligible institution in the state for the purpose of residency or internship.

A permit issued under this section is valid for the period specified by the board, but not to exceed 36 months after the date of issue. Upon application by a person who pays the required fee and has been accepted by an eligible institution in the state for the purpose of residency or internship, the board may renew a permit issued under this section for a period specified by the board, but not to exceed 36 months after the date of renewal.

History.

(§ 16 ch 148 SLA 1970; am § 13 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 10 ch 87 SLA 1987; am § 16 ch 126 SLA 1990; am § 4 ch 53 SLA 1999; am § 5 ch 66 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 73 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

Sec. 08.64.275.
Temporary permit for locum tenens practice.

A member of the board, its executive secretary, or a person designated by the board to issue temporary permits may grant a temporary permit to a physician or osteopath for the purpose of

substituting for another physician or osteopath licensed in this state;

being temporarily employed by a physician or osteopath licensed in this state while that physician or osteopath evaluates the permittee for permanent employment; or

being temporarily employed by a hospital or community mental health center while the facility attempts to fill a vacant permanent physician or osteopath staff position with a physician or osteopath licensed in this state.

A physician applying under (a) of this section shall pay the required fee and shall meet the requirements of AS

08.64.279

and the requirements of either AS

08.64.200

or

08.64.225

. In addition, the physician shall submit evidence of holding a license to practice medicine in a state or territory of the United States or in a province or territory of Canada.

An osteopath applying under (a) of this section shall pay the required fee and shall meet the requirements of AS

08.64.205

and

08.64.279

. In addition, the osteopath shall submit evidence of holding a license to practice in a state or territory of the United States or in a province or territory of Canada.

Within 10 days after the permit has been granted, the board member shall forward to the department a report of the issuance of the permit.

A permit issued under this section is initially valid for 90 consecutive calendar days. Upon request by a permittee, a permit issued under this section shall be extended for 60 calendar days by the board or its designee if, before the expiration of the initial 90-day permit, the permittee submits to the department a completed application form and the fee required for licensure under this chapter, except that the board may refuse to grant a request for an extension for the same reasons the board may refuse to grant a license under AS

08.64.240

. Permits and extensions of permits issued to an individual under this section are not valid for more than 240 calendar days during any consecutive 24 months.

Notwithstanding (e) of this section, a permit issued under this section may be extended by the board or its designee for a time period that exceeds the limit established in (e) of this section if the board or its designee determines that the extension is necessary in order to provide essential medical services for the protection of public health and safety and the board has received a

clearance report from the National Practitioner Data Bank;

physician profile from the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association;

clearance report from the United States Drug Enforcement Administration; and

completed application form and the fee required for licensure under this chapter.

History.

(§ 17 ch 77 SLA 1969; am §§ 17 — 19 ch 148 SLA 1970; am § 38 ch 37 SLA 1985; am §§ 17 — 20 ch 126 SLA 1990; am § 5 ch 53 SLA 1999; am § 6 ch 66 SLA 1999; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 37 SLA 2002; am § 10 ch 45 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For temporary courtesy licenses, see AS

08.01.062

.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (a), inserted “, or a person designated by the board to issue temporary permits” following “executive secretary:, and made related changes.

Sec. 08.64.276.
Retired status license.

On retiring from practice and payment of an appropriate one-time fee, a licensee in good standing with the board may apply for the conversion of an active or inactive license to a retired status license. A person holding a retired status license may not practice medicine, osteopathy, or podiatry in the state. A retired status license is valid for the life of the license holder and does not require renewal. A person holding a retired status license is exempt from AS

08.64.312

.

A person with a retired status license may apply for active licensure. Before issuing an active license under this subsection, the board may require the applicant to meet reasonable criteria as determined under regulations of the board, which may include submission of continuing medical education credits, reexamination requirements, physical and psychiatric examination requirements, an interview with the entire board, and review of information in the national data bank of the National Federation of State Medical Boards.

History.

(§ 21 ch 126 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

Sec. 08.64.279.
Interview for permits.

An applicant for an intern permit, a resident permit, or a temporary permit for locum tenens practice may be interviewed in person by the board, a member of the board, the executive secretary of the board, or a person designated for that purpose by the board.

History.

(§ 21 ch 126 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 23 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

Sec. 08.64.280.
Record of license. [Repealed, § 10 ch 37 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 08.64.290.
Examination fee. [Repealed, § 54 ch 37 SLA 1985.]

Sec. 08.64.300.
Fee for license by reciprocity. [Repealed, § 19 ch 77 SLA 1969.]

Sec. 08.64.310.
Annual license fee. [Repealed, § 20 ch 77 SLA 1969.]

Sec. 08.64.311.
License renewal. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.100.]

Sec. 08.64.312.
Continuing education requirements.

The board shall promote a high degree of competence in the practice of medicine, osteopathy, and podiatry by requiring every licensee of medicine, osteopathy, and podiatry in the state to fulfill continuing education requirements.

Before a license may be renewed, the licensee shall submit evidence to the board or its designee that continuing education requirements prescribed by regulations adopted by the board have been met. Continuing education requirements must include not less than two hours of education in pain management and opioid use and addiction in the two years preceding an application for renewal of a license, unless the licensee demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that the licensee’s practice does not include pain management and opioid treatment or prescribing.

The board or its designee may exempt a physician, osteopath, or podiatrist from the requirements of (b) of this section upon an application by the physician, osteopath, or podiatrist giving evidence satisfactory to the board or its designee that the physician, osteopath, or podiatrist is unable to comply with the requirements because of extenuating circumstances. However, a person may not be exempted from more than 15 hours of continuing education in a five-year period; a person may not be exempted from the requirement to receive at least two hours of education in pain management and opioid use and addiction unless the person has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board that the person does not currently hold a valid federal Drug Enforcement Administration registration number.

History.

(§ 14 ch 102 SLA 1976; am §§ 7, 8 ch 66 SLA 1999; am § 14 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For continuing medical education, see 12 AAC 40, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote the section.

Sec. 08.64.313.
Inactive license.

A licensee who does not practice in the state may hold an inactive license. A person who practices in the state, however infrequently, shall hold an active license.

History.

(§ 21 ch 148 SLA 1970; am § 12 ch 87 SLA 1987)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

For physician assistants, see 12 AAC 40, art. 5.

Sec. 08.64.315.
Fees.

The department shall set fees under AS

08.01.065

for each of the following:

application;

license by examination;

license by endorsement or waiver of examination;

temporary permit;

locum tenens permit;

license renewal, active;

license renewal, inactive;

license by reexamination.

History.

(§ 21 ch 77 SLA 1969; am § 22 ch 148 SLA 1970; am § 13 ch 48 SLA 1983; am § 39 ch 37 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For physician assistants, see 12 AAC 40, art. 5.

Sec. 08.64.320.
Disposition of fees. [Repealed, § 54 ch 37 SLA 1985.]

Sec. 08.64.325.
Limits or conditions on license; discipline. [Repealed, § 19 ch 48 SLA 1983.]

Sec. 08.64.326.
Grounds for imposition of disciplinary sanctions.

The board may impose a sanction if the board finds after a hearing that a licensee

secured a license through deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation;

engaged in deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation while providing professional services or engaging in professional activities;

advertised professional services in a false or misleading manner;

has been convicted, including conviction based on a guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere, of

a class A or unclassified felony or a crime in another jurisdiction with elements similar to a class A or unclassified felony in this jurisdiction;

a class B or class C felony or a crime in another jurisdiction with elements similar to a class B or class C felony in this jurisdiction if the felony or other crime is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the licensee; or

a crime involving the unlawful procurement, sale, prescription, or dispensing of drugs;

has procured, sold, prescribed, or dispensed drugs in violation of a law regardless of whether there has been a criminal action or harm to the patient;

intentionally or negligently permitted the performance of patient care by persons under the licensee’s supervision that does not conform to minimum professional standards even if the patient was not injured;

failed to comply with this chapter, a regulation adopted under this chapter, or an order of the board;

has demonstrated

professional incompetence, gross negligence, or repeated negligent conduct; the board may not base a finding of professional incompetence solely on the basis that a licensee’s practice is unconventional or experimental in the absence of demonstrable physical harm to a patient;

addiction to, severe dependency on, or habitual overuse of alcohol or other drugs that impairs the licensee’s ability to practice safely;

unfitness because of physical or mental disability;

engaged in unprofessional conduct, in sexual misconduct, or in lewd or immoral conduct in connection with the delivery of professional services to patients; in this paragraph, “sexual misconduct” includes sexual contact, as defined by the board in regulations adopted under this chapter, or attempted sexual contact with a patient outside the scope of generally accepted methods of examination or treatment of the patient, regardless of the patient’s consent or lack of consent, during the term of the physician-patient relationship, as defined by the board in regulations adopted under this chapter, unless the patient was the licensee’s spouse at the time of the contact or, immediately preceding the physician-patient relationship, was in a dating, courtship, or engagement relationship with the licensee;

has violated AS

18.16.010

;

has violated any code of ethics adopted by regulation by the board;

has denied care or treatment to a patient or person seeking assistance from the physician if the only reason for the denial is the failure or refusal of the patient to agree to arbitrate as provided in AS

09.55.535(a)

;

has had a license or certificate to practice medicine in another state or territory of the United States, or a province or territory of Canada, denied, suspended, revoked, surrendered while under investigation for an alleged violation, restricted, limited, conditioned, or placed on probation unless the denial, suspension, revocation, or other action was caused by the failure of the licensee to pay fees to that state, territory, or province; or

prescribed or dispensed an opioid in excess of the maximum dosage authorized under AS

08.64.363

.

In a case involving (a)(13) of this section, the final findings of fact, conclusions of law and order of the authority that suspended or revoked a license or certificate constitutes a prima facie case that the license or certificate was suspended or revoked and the grounds under which the suspension or revocation was granted.

History.

(§ 14 ch 48 SLA 1983; am § 22 ch 126 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 52 SLA 1995; am § 9 ch 66 SLA 1999; am § 15 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Administrative Code. —

For continuing medical education, see 12 AAC 40, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 26, 2017, in (a)(5), added “or harm to the patient” at the end; added (a)(14), and made related changes.

Sec. 08.64.330.
Grounds for revocation of license. [Repealed, § 19 ch 48 SLA 1983.]

Sec. 08.64.331.
Disciplinary sanctions.

If the board finds that a licensee has committed an act set out in AS

08.64.326(a)

, the board may

permanently revoke a license to practice;

suspend a license for a determinate period of time;

censure a licensee;

issue a letter of reprimand;

place a licensee on probationary status and require the licensee to

report regularly to the board on matters involving the basis of probation;

limit practice to those areas prescribed;

continue professional education until a satisfactory degree of skill has been attained in those areas determined by the board to need improvement;

impose limitations or conditions on the practice of a licensee;

impose a civil fine of not more than $25,000; or

impose one or more of the sanctions set out in (1) — (7) of this subsection.

The board may end the probation of a licensee if it finds that the deficiencies which required this sanction have been remedied.

The board may summarily suspend a license before final hearing or during the appeals process if the board finds that the licensee poses a clear and immediate danger to the public health and safety if the licensee continues to practice. A person whose license is suspended under this section is entitled to a hearing conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) not later than seven days after the effective date of the order, and the person may appeal the suspension after a hearing to a court of competent jurisdiction.

The board may reinstate a license that has been suspended or revoked if the board finds after a hearing that the applicant is able to practice with reasonable skill and safety.

The board may suspend a license upon receipt of a certified copy of evidence that a license to practice medicine in another state or territory of the United States or province of Canada has been suspended or revoked. The suspension remains in effect until a hearing can be held by the board.

The board shall be consistent in the application of disciplinary sanctions. A significant departure from earlier decisions of the board involving similar situations must be explained in findings of fact or orders made by the board.

History.

(§ 15 ch 48 SLA 1983; am § 13 ch 87 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 2001; am § 17 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For disciplinary powers of board generally, see AS

08.01.075

.

Sec. 08.64.332.
Automatic suspension for mental incompetency or insanity.

Notwithstanding AS 44.62, if a person holding a license to practice medicine or osteopathy under this chapter is adjudged mentally incompetent or insane by a final order or adjudication of a court of competent jurisdiction or by voluntary commitment to an institution for the treatment of mental illness, the person’s license shall be suspended by the board. The suspension shall continue in effect until the court finds or adjudges that the person has been restored to reason or until a licensed psychiatrist approved by the board determines that the person has been restored to reason.

History.

(§ 10 ch 101 SLA 1974; am § 14 ch 87 SLA 1987)

Sec. 08.64.334.
Voluntary surrender.

The board, at its discretion, may accept the voluntary surrender of a license.
A license may not be returned unless the board determines, under regulations adopted by it, that the licensee is competent to resume practice.
However, a license may not be returned to the licensee if the voluntary surrender resulted in the dropping or suspension of civil or criminal charges against the physician.

History.

(§ 10 ch 101 SLA 1974)

Sec. 08.64.335.
Reports of disciplinary action or license suspension or surrender.

The board shall promptly report to the Federation of State Medical Boards for inclusion in the nationwide disciplinary data bank license and permit refusals under AS

08.64.240

, actions taken by the board under AS

08.64.331

, and license and permit suspensions or surrenders under AS

08.64.332

or

08.64.334

.

History.

(§ 15 ch 87 SLA 1987; am § 23 ch 126 SLA 1990)